Idaho, session 2026, H0526.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 16, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-1608, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-1608. COTTAGE FOOD OPERATIONS. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, a cottage food operation making sales that do not exceed
five thousand dollars ($5,000) in cumulative gross receipts in the current
or previous calendar year may sell time/temperature control for safety foods
directly to a consumer.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.